South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S521.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 11, Title 9 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 9-11-28. (A) After December 31, 2025, a council of a municipality may allow a municipal court judge to participate in the Police Officers Retirement System or may elect for the municipal court judge to remain in the South Carolina Retirement System. (B) From July 1, 2025, to January 1, 2026, a municipal judge who elects to transfer credited service received under the South Carolina Retirement System to the South Carolina Police Officers Retirement System may do so upon payment of the accumulated employer and employee contributions and interest in the South Carolina Retirement System plus five percent of his annual salary in effect as of June 30, 2025, for each year of service prorated for periods of less than a year. After January 1, 2026, a municipal judge may elect to transfer credited service received under the South Carolina Retirement System to the South Carolina Police Officers Retirement System as provided in Section 9-11-40(9). SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----